Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,108
Commercial put-and-take fishing; license; issuance; fee; violation; penalty.

(1) No fishing permit shall be required for fishing in any duly licensed commercial put-and-take fishery operating under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The annual fee for licensing such commercial put-and-take fishery shall be not more than seventy-five dollars per year, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327, payable in advance, and no person shall operate such an establishment without first obtaining such license from the commission. Before issuing such license the commission shall investigate each such establishment annually and be satisfied that the same is a bona fide commercial put-and-take fishery operating within all applicable state and federal laws.

(2) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall be fined at least forty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 218;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 18;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 18.